src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Verb inflection for Mansi
! ---------------






LEXICON VAANGKVE
: INF ;
:г IND_PRS_TEENGKVE ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VA ;
!20230901: ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG2_sn ;
!20230901: ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG2_snyn ;
:г%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCSG_lumeen ;
:г%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCDU ;
:г%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCPL ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slumeen ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_OCDU ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_OCPL ;
: ACT_COND_VU ;
: ACT_IMPRT ;
: V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
:й PASS_PRT ;
: PASS_COND ;
:г PASS_IMPRT ;
:и GER ;
:г VABESS ;
: PRSPRC ;
: PRFPRC ;


LEXICON TEENGKVE !тэ̄ӈкве+V:т
:э̄ INF ;
:э̄г IND_PRS_TEENGKVE ;
:э̄ ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VA ;
:э̄ ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG2_sn ;
:э̄ ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG2_snyn ;
:э̄г%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCSG_lumeen ;
:э̄г%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCDU ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}гн VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-lingkwe; FOR V-6-tengkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}гнын VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-lingkwe; FOR V-6-tengkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}гаме̄н VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-lingkwe; FOR V-6-tengkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}гагы̄н VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-lingkwe; FOR V-6-tengkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}гаге̄н VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-lingkwe; FOR V-6-tengkwe

:э̄г%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCPL ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}нанме̄н VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}нанэ̄н VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}нанув VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl:э̄г%{VU%}%>%{аяØ%}нанӯв VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901
:э̄ ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slumeen ;
:э̄ ACT_IND_PRT_OCDU ;
:э̄ ACT_IND_PRT_OCPL ;
:э̄ ACT_COND_VU ;
:а̄ ACT_IMPRT ;
:э̄ V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
:а̄й PASS_PRT ;
:э̄ PASS_COND ;
:э̄г PASS_IMPRT_teegveen ;
:а̄и GER ;
:э̄г VABESS ;
:э̄ PRSPRC ;
:э̄ PRFPRC_teemanum ;


LEXICON JINGKVE
:йи INF ; !!≈ @CODE@
:йи PRSPRC_jingkve ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:ювум VERB_K ; !мыгӯв?
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:ювын VERB_K ;  !мае̄н? 
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:юв VERB_K ;  !мае̄н? 
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:ювме̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:ювын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:ювы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:ювыг VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:ювув VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:ювӯв VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:ювын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:ювы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:ювыт VERB_K ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG1_sum ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG2_syn ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG3_ys ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU1_sumeen ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU2_syn ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU2_syyn ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU3_syg ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU3_syyg ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL1_suv ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL1_suuv ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL2_syn ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL2_syyn ;
:йи ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL3_syt ;

!Cond
:йи ACT_COND_VU ;
:яй%{VU%} ACT_IMPRT ;

:йи V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;
:яй PASS_PRT ;
!+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:яй%>весӯв VERB_K ;!янытлавесӯв Jaska 20230901, AGAINST V-6-lingkwe, tengkwe, wingkwe, mingkwe ;FOR V-6-jingkwe
:йи PASS_COND ;
:йи PASS_IMPRT ;
:йи PRFPRC ;
:йийи GER ;
:йим VABESS ;

LEXICON LYNGKVE
:лы INF ; !!≈ @CODE@
:лы PRSPRC ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:лыгум VERB_K ; !мыгӯв?
!+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:лаен VERB_K ;  !мае̄н? 
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:лыгын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:лыг VERB_K ;  !мае̄н? 
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:лыгме̄н VERB_K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:лае̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:лыгын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:лыгы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:лыгыг VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:лыгӯв VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:лыгув VERB_K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:лае̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:лыгын VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:лыгы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:лыгыт VERB_K ;

:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VA ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG1_sum ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG2_syn ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG3_ys ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU1_ysmeen ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU2_syyn ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU3_syyg ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL1_suv ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL1_suuv ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL2_syyn ;
!:лы ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL3_syt ;

:лыг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCSG_lumeen ;
:лыг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCDU ;
:лыг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCPL ;
:лы ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slumeen ;
:лы ACT_IND_PRT_OCDU ;
:лы ACT_IND_PRT_OCPL ;

!Cond
:лы ACT_COND_VU ;
:лай%{VU%} ACT_IMPRT_VU ;
+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl:лай%{VU%}%>%{ЭЕLong%}нын VERB_K ;! Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-tengkwe ; FOR V-6-mingkwe, wingkwe, V-6-lingkwe
+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl:лай%{VU%}%>%{ЭЕLong%}нын VERB_K ;! Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-tengkwe ; FOR V-6-mingkwe, wingkwe, V-6-lingkwe

:лы V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;

:лай PASS_PRT ;
:лы PASS_COND ;
:лыг PASS_IMPRT_teegveen ;
:лы PRFPRC_teemanum ;!Will need more 20230622
:ла̄и GER ;
:лыг VABESS ;

LEXICON MINGKVE
:ми INF ; !!≈ @CODE@
:ми PRSPRC ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:мыгум VERB_K ; !мыгӯв?
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:мыгын VERB_K ;  !мае̄н? 
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:мыг VERB_K ;  !мае̄н? 
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:мыгме̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:мыгы̄н VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, V-6-mingkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:мыгын VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, V-6-mingkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:мыгыг VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:мыгӯв VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:мыгув VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, V-6-mingkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:мыгы̄н VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, V-6-mingkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:мыгын VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, V-6-mingkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:мыгыт VERB_K ;

:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG1_sum ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG2_syn ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG3_ys ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU1_ysmeen ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU2_syyn ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU3_syyg ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL1_suv ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL2_syyn ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL3_syt ;

:ми ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VA ;

:мыг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCSG_lumeen ;
:мыг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCDU ;
:мыг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCPL ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slumeen ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_OCDU ;
:ми ACT_IND_PRT_OCPL ;

!Cond
:ми ACT_COND_VU ;
:май%{VU%} ACT_IMPRT_VU ;
+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl:май%{VU%}%>%{ЭЕLong%}нын VERB_K ;! Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-tengkwe ; FOR V-6-mingkwe, wingkwe, V-6-lingkwe
+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl:май%{VU%}%>%{ЭЕLong%}нын VERB_K ;! Jaska 20230901 AGAINST V-6-tengkwe ; FOR V-6-mingkwe, wingkwe, V-6-lingkwe
:ми V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;

:май PASS_PRT ;
:ми PASS_COND ;
:мыг PASS_IMPRT_teegveen ;
:ми PRFPRC_teemanum ;!Will need more 20230622
:ма̄и GER ;
:мыг VABESS ;


LEXICON VINGKVE
:ви INF ; !!≈ @CODE@
:ви PRSPRC ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:выгум VERB_K ; !мыгӯв?
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:выгын VERB_K ;  !мае̄н? 
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:выг VERB_K ;  !мае̄н? 
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:выгме̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:выгы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:выгын VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, V-6-wingkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:выгыг VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:выгӯв VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:выгув VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:выгы̄н VERB_K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:выгын VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, V-6-wingkwe
+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:выгыт VERB_K ;

:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG1_sum ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG2_syn ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCSG3_ys ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU1_ysmeen ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU2_syyn ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCDU3_syyg ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL1_suv ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL1_suuv ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL2_syyn ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SCPL3_syt ;



:ви ACT_IND_PRT_SC_VA ;

:выг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCSG_lumeen ;
:выг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCDU ;
:выг%{VU%} ACT_IND_PRS_OCPL ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_OCSG_slumeen ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_OCDU ;
:ви ACT_IND_PRT_OCPL ;

!Cond
:ви ACT_COND_VU ;
:вой%{VU%} ACT_IMPRT_VU ;
+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl:вой%{VU%}%>%{ЭЕLong%}нын VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, AGAINST V-6-tengkwe ; FOR V-6-mingkwe, wingkwe, V-6-lingkwe
+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl:вой%{VU%}%>%{ЭЕLong%}нын VERB_K ;!Jaska 20230901, AGAINST V-6-tengkwe ; FOR V-6-mingkwe, wingkwe, V-6-lingkwe

:ви V11_MUTUAL_PASS_PRS ;

:вой PASS_PRT ;! 
+Use/NG:вуй PASS_PRT ;!
:ви PASS_COND ;
:выг PASS_IMPRT_teegveen ;
:ви PRFPRC_teemanum ;!Will need more 20230622
:вои GER ;
:выг VABESS ;
