src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
ва̄ӈкве+V:ва̄ VAANGKVE ;
тэ̄ӈкве+V:т TEENGKVE ;
йиӈкве+V: JINGKVE ;
лыӈкве+V: LYNGKVE ;
миӈкве+V: MINGKVE ;
виӈкве+V: VINGKVE ;
